Arkansas, session 2025, HB1144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2507(a), concerning eligibility
requirements for private schools that wish to participate in the Arkansas
Children's Educational Freedom Account Program, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(14)(A) Comply with any reporting requirement under this title
and department rules to which a public school district or an open-enrollment
public charter school is subject.
(B)(i) A private school shall comply with the reporting
requirement under subdivision (a)(14)(A) of this section within thirty (30)
days of the date by which public school districts and open-enrollment public
*TNL076*
01-29-2025 08:52:42 TNL076

As Engrossed: H1/29/25 HB1144
charter schools must comply with a specific reporting requirement.
(ii) If a private school fails to comply in a timely
manner with the reporting requirement under subdivision (a)(14)(A) of this
section, then the private school is ineligible to participate in the program.

/s/Wooten






























01-29-2025 08:52:42 TNL076